North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act
10-32.1-41.
Standards of conduct for members, managers, and governors.

A member of a member-managed limited liability company owes to the company and, subject to subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-33, the other members the fiduciary duties of loyalty and care stated in subsections 2 and 3.

The duty of loyalty of a member in a member-managed limited liability company includes the duties:

To account to the company and to hold as trustee for it any property, profit, or benefit derived by the member:

In the conduct or winding up of the activities of the company;

From a use by the member of the property of the company; or

From the appropriation of a limited liability company opportunity;

To refrain from dealing with the company in the conduct or winding up of the activities of the company as or on behalf of a person having an interest adverse to the company; and

To refrain from competing with the company in the conduct of the activities of the company before the dissolution of the company.

Subject to the business judgment rule, the duty of care of a member of a member-managed limited liability company in the conduct and winding up of the activities of the company is to act with the care that a person in a like position would reasonably exercise under similar circumstances and in a manner the member reasonably believes to be in the best interests of the company. In discharging this duty, a member may rely in good faith on opinions, reports, statements, or other information provided by another person that the member reasonably believes is a competent and reliable source for the information.

A member in a limited liability company shall discharge the duties of the member and exercise any rights under this chapter or under the operating agreement consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing, including acting in a manner, in light of the operating agreement, that is honest, fair, and reasonable.

It is a defense to a claim under subdivision b of subsection 2, and any comparable claim in equity or at common law that the transaction was fair to the limited liability company.

All of the members of a member-managed limited liability company or a manager-managed limited liability company may authorize or ratify, after full disclosure of all material facts, a specific act or transaction that otherwise would violate the duty of loyalty.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

Subsections 1, 2, 3, and 5 apply to the manager or managers and not the members.

The duty stated under subdivision c of subsection 2 continues until winding up is completed.

Subsection 4 applies to the members and managers.

Subsection 6 applies only to the members.

A member does not have any fiduciary duty to the company or to any other member solely by reason of being a member.

In a board-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

Subsections 1, 2, 3, and 5 apply to the governors and not the members.

The duty stated under subdivision c of subsection 2 continues until winding up is completed.

Subsection 4 applies to the members and governors.

Subsection 6 applies only to the members.

A member does not have any fiduciary duty to the company or to any other member solely by reason of being a member.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-42.
Right of members, managers, governors, and dissociated members to information.

In a member-managed or board-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

On reasonable notice, a member may inspect and copy during regular business hours, at a reasonable location specified by the company, any record maintained by the company regarding the activities, financial condition, and other circumstances of the company, to the extent the information is material to the rights and duties of the member under the operating agreement or this chapter.

The company shall furnish to each member:

Without demand, any information concerning the activities, financial condition, and other circumstances of the company which the company knows and is material to the proper exercise of the rights and duties of the member under the operating agreement or this chapter, except to the extent the company can establish that it reasonably believes the member already knows the information; and

On demand, any other information concerning the activities, financial condition, and other circumstances of the company, except to the extent the demand or information demanded is unreasonable or otherwise improper under the circumstances.

The duty to furnish information under subdivision b also applies to each member to the extent the member knows any of the information described in subdivision b.

In a manager-managed limited liability company, the following rules apply:

The informational rights stated in subsection 1 and the duty stated in subdivision c of subsection 1, apply to the managers or governors and not the members.

During regular business hours and at a reasonable location specified by the company, a member may obtain from the company and inspect and copy full information regarding the activities, financial condition, and other circumstances of the company as is just and reasonable if:

The member seeks the information for a purpose material to the interest of the member as a member;

The member makes a demand in a record received by the company, describing with reasonable particularity the information sought and the purpose for seeking the information; and

The information sought is directly connected to the purpose of the member.

Within ten days after receiving a demand pursuant to paragraph 3 of subdivision b, the company shall in a record inform the member that made the demand:

Of the information that the company will provide in response to the demand and when and where the company will provide the information; and

If the company declines to provide any demanded information, then the reasons of the company for declining.

Whenever this chapter or an operating agreement provides for a member to give or withhold consent to a matter, before the consent is given or withheld, the company shall, without demand, provide the member with all information that is known to the company and is material to the decision of the member.

On ten days’ demand made in a record received by a limited liability company, a dissociated member may have access to information to which the person was entitled while a member if the information pertains to the period during which the person was a member, the person seeks the information in good faith, and the person satisfies the requirements imposed on a member by subdivision b of subsection 2. The company shall respond to a demand made pursuant to this subsection in the manner provided in subdivision c of subsection 2.

A limited liability company may charge a person that makes a demand under this section the reasonable costs of copying, limited to the costs of labor and material.

A member or dissociated member may exercise rights under this section through an agent or, in the case of an individual under legal disability, a legal representative. Any restriction or condition imposed by the operating agreement or under subsection 7 applies both to the agent or legal representative and the member or dissociated member.

The rights under this section do not extend to a person as transferee.

In addition to any restriction or condition stated in its operating agreement, a limited liability company, as a matter within the ordinary course of its activities, may impose reasonable restrictions and conditions on access to and use of information to be furnished under this section, including designating information confidential and imposing nondisclosure and safeguarding obligations on the recipient. In a dispute concerning the reasonableness of a restriction under this subsection, the company has the burden of proving reasonableness.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-43.
Nature of a transferable interest.

A transferable interest is personal property.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-44.
Transfer of a transferable interest.

A transfer, in whole or in part, of a transferable interest:

Is permissible;

Does not by itself cause the dissociation of a member or a dissolution and winding up of the activities of the limited liability company; and

Subject to section 10-32.1-46, does not entitle the transferee to:

Participate in the management or conduct of the activities of the company; or

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, have access to records or other information concerning the activities of the company.

A transferee has the right to receive, in accordance with the transfer, distributions to which the transferor would otherwise be entitled.

In a dissolution and winding up of a limited liability company, a transferee is entitled to an account of the transactions of the company only from the date of dissolution.

A transferable interest may be evidenced by a certificate of the interest issued by the limited liability company in a record, and, subject to this section, the interest represented by the certificate may be transferred by a transfer of the certificate.

A limited liability company need not give effect to the rights of a transferee under this section until the company has notice of the transfer.

A transfer of a transferable interest in violation of a restriction on transfer contained in the operating agreement is ineffective as to a person having notice of the restriction at the time of transfer.

Except as otherwise provided in subdivision b of subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-48, when a member transfers a transferable interest, the transferor retains the rights of a member other than the interest in distributions transferred and retains all duties and obligations of a member.

When a member transfers a transferable interest to a person that becomes a member with respect to the transferred interest, the transferee is liable for the obligations of the member under section 10-32.1-29 and subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-32, known to the transferee when the transferee becomes a member.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-45.
Charging order.

On application by a judgment creditor of a member or transferee and following notice to the limited liability company of the application, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment.

A charging order constitutes a lien on the transferable interest of a judgment debtor and requires the limited liability company to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that would otherwise be paid to the judgment debtor.

The member or transferee whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

At any time before extinguishment under subsection 3, a limited liability company or one or more members whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

This chapter does not deprive any member or transferee of the benefit of any exemption laws applicable to the transferable interest of the member or transferee.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking to enforce a judgment against a member or transferee may, in the capacity of judgment creditor, satisfy the judgment from the transferable interest of the judgment debtor.

No other remedy, including foreclosure of the transferable interest or a court order for directions, accounts, and inquiries that the debtor member might have made, is available to the judgment creditor that is attempting to satisfy the judgment out of the judgment debtor’s interest in the limited liability company.

No creditor of a member or transferee has any right to obtain possession of or otherwise exercise legal or equitable remedies with respect to a property of the company.

This section applies to single member limited liability companies and limited liability companies with more than one member.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 82, § 5, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-46.
Power of the personal representative of a deceased member.

If a member dies, then the personal representative of the deceased member or other legal representative may exercise the rights of a transferee provided in subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-44, and, for the purposes of settling the estate, the rights of a current member under section 10-32.1-42.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-47.
Power of a member to dissociate — Wrongful dissociation.

A person has the power to dissociate as a member at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by withdrawing as a member by express will under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-48.

The dissociation of a person from a limited liability company is wrongful only if the dissociation:

Is in breach of an express provision of the operating agreement; or

Occurs before the termination of the company and:

The person withdraws as a member by express will;

The person is expelled as a member by judicial order under subsection 5 of section 10-32.1-48;

The person is dissociated under subdivision a of subsection 7 of section 10-32.1-48, by becoming a debtor in bankruptcy; or

In the case of a person that is not a trust other than a business trust, an estate, or an individual, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated as a member because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

A person that wrongfully dissociates as a member is liable to the limited liability company and, subject to section 10-32.1-33, to the other members for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any other debt, obligation, or other liability of the member to the company or the other members.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-48.
Events causing dissociation.

A person is dissociated as a member from a limited liability company when:

The company has notice of the express will of the person to withdraw as a member, but, if the person specified a withdrawal date later than the date the company had notice, then on that later date;

An event stated in the operating agreement as causing the dissociation of the person occurs;

The person is expelled as a member pursuant to the operating agreement;

The person is expelled as a member by the unanimous consent of the other members if:

It is unlawful to carry on the activities of the company with the person as a member;

There has been a transfer of all of the transferable interest of the person in the company, other than:

A transfer for security purposes; or

A charging order in effect under section 10-32.1-45 which has not been foreclosed;

The person is a corporation and, within ninety days after the company notifies the person that it will be expelled as a member because:

The person has filed articles of dissolution or the equivalent;

Its charter has been revoked;

Its right to conduct business has been suspended by the jurisdiction of its incorporation;

The articles of dissolution have not been revoked; or

Its charter or right to conduct business has not been reinstated; or

The person is a limited liability company or partnership that has been dissolved and whose business is being wound up;

On application by the company, the person is expelled as a member by judicial order because the person:

Has engaged, or is engaging, in wrongful conduct that has adversely and materially affected, or will adversely and materially affect, the activities of the company;

Has willfully or persistently committed, or is willfully and persistently committing, a material breach of the operating agreement or the duties or obligations of the person under section 10-32.1-41; or

Has engaged, or is engaging, in conduct relating to the activities of the company which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities with the person as a member;

In the case of a person who is an individual:

The individual dies; or

In a member-managed limited liability company:

A guardian or general conservator for the individual is appointed; or

There is a judicial order that the individual has otherwise become incapable of performing the duties of the individual as a member under this chapter or the operating agreement;

In a member-managed limited liability company, the person:

Becomes a debtor in bankruptcy;

Executes an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or

Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or substantially all of the property of the person;

In the case of a person that is a trust or is acting as a member by virtue of being a trustee of a trust, the entire transferable interest of the trust in the company is distributed;

In the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a member by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, the entire transferable interest of the estate in the company is distributed;

In the case of a member that is not an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, trust, or estate, the termination of the member;

The company participates in a merger under sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71, if:

The company is not the surviving entity; or

Otherwise as a result of the merger, the person ceases to be a member;

The company participates in a conversion under sections 10-32.1-61 through 10-32.1-71;

The company participates in a domestication under sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71, if, as a result of the domestication, the person ceases to be a member; or

The company terminates.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-49.
Effect of the dissociation of a person as member.

When a person is dissociated as a member of a limited liability company:

The right of the person to participate as a member in the management and conduct of the activities of the company terminates;

If the company is member-managed, then the fiduciary duties of the person as a member end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the dissociation of the person; and

Subject to sections 10-32.1-46 and 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71, any transferable interest owned by the person immediately before dissociation in the capacity of the person as a member is owned by the person solely as a transferee.

The dissociation of a person as a member of a limited liability company does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the company or the other members that the person incurred while a member.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-50.
Events causing dissolution.

A limited liability company is dissolved, and its activities must be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following:

An event or circumstance that the operating agreement states causes dissolution;

The consent of all the members;

Following the admission of the initial member or members, the passage of ninety consecutive days during which the company has no members;

On application by a member, the entry by appropriate court of an order dissolving the company on the grounds that:

The conduct of all or substantially all of the activities of the company are unlawful; or

It is not reasonably practicable to carry on the activities of the company in conformity with the articles of organization and the operating agreement;

On application by a member, the entry by appropriate court of an order dissolving the company on the grounds that the managers, governors, or those members in control of the company:

Have acted, are acting, or will act in a manner that is illegal or fraudulent; or

Have acted or are acting in a manner that is oppressive and was, is, or will be directly harmful to the applicant.

In a proceeding brought under subdivision e of subsection 1, the court may order a remedy other than dissolution, which may include the sale for fair value of all membership interests a member owns in a limited liability company to the limited liability company or one or more of the other members. A remedy other than dissolution may be ordered in any case where that remedy would be appropriate under all the facts and circumstances of the case.

A proceeding brought under subdivision e of subsection 1 must be brought in a court within the county in which the registered office of the limited liability company is located. It is not necessary to make members parties to the action or proceeding unless relief is sought against them personally.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-51.
Winding up.

A dissolved limited liability company shall wind up its activities, and the company continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.

In winding up its activities, a limited liability company:

Shall discharge the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the company, settle and close the activities of the company, and marshal and distribute the assets of the company; and

May:

File with the secretary of state a notice of dissolution stating the name of the company and that the company is dissolved;

Preserve the company activities and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

Transfer the property of the company;

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;

File with the secretary of state articles of dissolution and termination stating the name of the company and that the company is terminated; and

Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

If a dissolved limited liability company has no members, then the legal representative of the last person to have been a member may wind up the activities of the company. If the person does so, then the person has the powers of a sole manager under subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-39, and is deemed to be a manager for the purposes of subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-26.

If the legal representative under subsection 3 declines or fails to wind up the activities of the company, then a person may be appointed to do so by the consent of transferees owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions as transferees at the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection:

Has the powers of a sole manager under subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-39, and is deemed to be a manager for the purposes of subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-26; and

Shall promptly file with the secretary of state an amendment to the articles of organization of the company to:

State that the company has no members;

State that the person has been appointed pursuant to this subsection to wind up the company; and

Provide the mailing address of the person.

The appropriate court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved limited liability company, including the appointment of a person to wind up the activities of the company:

On application of a member, if the applicant establishes good cause;

On the application of a transferee, if:

The company does not have any members;

The legal representative of the last person to have been a member declines or fails to wind up the activities of the company; and

Within a reasonable time following the dissolution a person has not been appointed pursuant to subsection 4; or

In connection with a proceeding under subdivision d or e of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-50.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-52.
Known claims against a dissolved limited liability company.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, a dissolved limited liability company may give notice of a known claim under subsection 2 that has the effect as provided in subsection 3.

A dissolved limited liability company may in a record notify its known claimants of the dissolution. The notice must:

Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

Provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State the deadline for receipt of the claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty days after the date the notice is received by the claimant; and

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline.

A claim against a dissolved limited liability company is barred if the requirements of subsection 2 are met and:

The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

If the claim is timely received but rejected by the company:

The company causes the claimant to receive a notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the company to enforce the claim within ninety days after the claimant receives the notice of rejection; and

The claimant does not commence the required action within the ninety days.

This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the effective date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-53.
Other claims against a dissolved limited liability company.

A dissolved limited liability company may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the company to present them according to the notice.

The notice authorized by subsection 1 must:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or counties in this state in which the principal executive office of the dissolved limited liability company is located or, if it has none in this state, then in the county or counties in which the registered office of the company is or was last located;

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent; and

State that a claim against the company is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced within five years after publication of the notice.

If a dissolved limited liability company publishes a notice according to subdivision b, unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the company within five years after the publication date of the notice, then the claim of each of the following claimants is barred:

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under section 10-32.1-52;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the company but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the effective date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section may be enforced:

Against a dissolved limited liability company, to the extent of its undistributed assets; and

If assets of the company have been distributed after dissolution, then against a member or transferee to the extent of the proportionate share of the claim of that person or of the assets distributed to the member or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but the total liability of a person for all claims under this subdivision does not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-54.
Distribution of assets in winding up limited liability activities of the company.

Except as provided in subsection 5, in winding up its activities, a limited liability company shall apply its assets to discharge its obligations to creditors, including members that are creditors.

After a limited liability company complies with subsection 1, any surplus must be distributed in the following order, subject to any charging order in effect under section 10-32.1-45:

To each person owning a transferable interest that reflects contributions made by a member and not previously returned, an amount equal to the value of the unreturned contributions; and

In equal shares among members and dissociated members, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under section 10-32.1-44.

If a limited liability company does not have sufficient surplus to comply with subdivision a of subsection 2, then any surplus must be distributed among the owners of transferable interests in proportion to the value of their respective unreturned contributions.

All distributions made under subsections 2 and 3 must be paid in money.

Notwithstanding subsections 1 through 4, in winding up its activities a limited liability company created after July 31, 2017, shall apply its assets to discharge its obligations to creditors, including members that are creditors.

After a limited liability company complies with subdivision a, any surplus must be distributed in the following order, subject to any charging order in effect under section 10-32.1-45 and unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or an operating agreement:

To each person owning a transferable interest that reflects contributions made by a member and not previously returned, an amount equal to the value of the unreturned contributions; and

In proportion to the value of the contributions of members and dissociated members, except to the extent necessary to comply with any transfer effective under section 10-32.1-44.

If a limited liability company does not have sufficient surplus to comply with paragraph 1 of subdivision b, any surplus must be distributed among the owners of transferable interests in proportion to the value of their respective unreturned contributions.

All distributions made under subdivisions a and b must be paid in money unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or in an operating agreement, or by the unanimous consent of the voting members.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2017, ch. 82, § 6, effective August 1, 2017.

10-32.1-55.
Merger, conversion, and domestication — Definitions.

For the purposes of sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-71, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Constituent limited liability company” means a constituent organization that is a limited liability company.

“Constituent organization” means an organization that is party to a merger or exchange.

“Converted organization” means the organization into which a converting organization converts pursuant to sections 10-32.1-61 through 10-32.1-66.

“Converting limited liability company” means a converting organization that is a limited liability company.

“Converting organization” means an organization that converts into another organization pursuant to section 10-32.1-61.

“Domesticated company” means the company that exists after a domesticating foreign limited liability company or limited liability company effects a domestication pursuant to sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71.

“Domesticating company” means the company that effects a domestication pursuant to sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71.

“Governing statute” of an organization means:

With respect to a domestic organization, the following chapters of this code which govern the internal affairs of the organization:

If a corporation, then chapter 10-19.1;

If a limited liability company, then this chapter;

If a general partnership, then chapters 45-13 through 45-21;

If a limited partnership, then chapter 45-10.2;

If a limited liability partnership, then chapter 45-22; and

If a limited liability limited partnership, then chapter 45-23; and

With respect to a foreign organization, the laws of the jurisdiction under which the organization is created and which govern the internal affairs of the organization.

“Organization” has the meaning provided in subsection 38 of section 10-32.1-02.

“Organizational documents” means:

For a domestic or foreign general partnership, its partnership agreement;

For a limited partnership or foreign limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership and partnership agreement;

For a domestic or foreign limited liability company, its certificate or articles of organization and operating agreement, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute;

For a business trust, its agreement of trust and declaration of trust;

For a domestic or foreign corporation for profit, its articles of incorporation, bylaws, and other agreements among its shareholders which are authorized by its governing statute, or comparable records as provided in its governing statute; and

For any other organization, the basic records that create the organization and determine its internal governance and the relations among the persons that own it, have an interest in it, or are members of it.

“Originating Records” has the meaning provided in subsection 39 of section 10-32.1-02.

“Personal liability” means liability for a debt, obligation, or other liability of an organization which is imposed on a person that co-owns, has an interest in, or is a member of the organization:

By the governing statute solely by reason of the person co-owning, having an interest in, or being a member of the organization; or

By the organizational documents of the organization under a provision of the governing statute authorizing those documents to make one or more specified persons liable for all or specified debts, obligations, or other liabilities of the organization solely by reason of the person or persons co-owning, having an interest, or interests in, or being a member, or members of the organization.

“Surviving organization” means the organization resulting from a merger which:

May pre-exist the merger; or

May be created by the merger.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-56.
Merger and exchange.

A limited liability company may merge with one or more other constituent organizations pursuant to this section, sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-59, 10-32.1-71, and a plan of merger if:

The governing statute of each of the other organizations authorizes the merger;

The merger is not prohibited by the law of a jurisdiction that enacted any of the governing statutes; and

Each of the other organizations complies with its governing statute in effecting the merger.

A limited liability company may engage in an exchange with one or more other constituent organizations pursuant to this section by which one of the constituent organizations acquires all of the ownership interests of one or more classes or series of another constituent organization pursuant to this section, sections 10-32.1-55 through 10-32.1-58, 10-32.1-60, and 10-32.1-71, and a plan of exchange if:

The governing statute of each of the other constituent organizations authorizes the exchange;

The exchange is not prohibited by the law of a jurisdiction that enacted any of the governing statutes; and

Each of the other constituent organizations complies with its governing statute in effecting the exchange.

A plan of merger or exchange must be in a record and must include:

The name and form of each constituent organization and:

In the case of a merger:

The name and form of the surviving organization and, if the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, then a statement to that effect;

The terms and conditions of the merger, including the manner and basis for converting the interests in each constituent organization into any combination of money, interests in the surviving organization, and other consideration; and

If the surviving organization is to be created by the merger, then the originating record of the surviving organization that is proposed to be in a record;

If the surviving organization is not to be created by the merger, then any amendments to be made by the merger to the organizational documents of the surviving organization that are, or are proposed to be, in a record; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed merger that are considered necessary or desirable.

In the case of an exchange:

The name of the acquiring organization;

The terms and conditions of the exchange, including the manner and basis of exchanging the ownership interests to be acquired for securities of, or other ownership interests in, the acquiring organization or any other organization or, in whole or part, for money or other property; and

Any other provisions with respect to the proposed exchange that are considered necessary or desirable.

If an organization is not the surviving organization but is the owner of a service mark, trademark, or trade name, is a general partner named in a fictitious name certificate, is a general partner in a limited partnership or a limited liability limited partnership, or is a managing partner of a limited liability partnership that is on file with the secretary of state, then it must change or amend the name of the organization to its name in each registration when filing the articles of merger.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-57.
Action on a plan of merger or exchange by a constituent limited liability company.

Subject to section 10-32.1-71, a plan of merger or exchange must be consented to by all the members of a constituent limited liability company.

Subject to section 10-32.1-71 and any contractual rights, after a merger or exchange is approved, and at any time before the merger or exchange becomes effective according to this chapter, a constituent limited liability company may amend the plan or abandon the merger or exchange:

As provided in the plan; or

Except as otherwise prohibited in the plan, with the same consent as was required to approve the plan.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.